Wisconsin, session 2025, SB157.
do enact as follows:SB157,11Section 1. 146.36 of the statutes is created to read:SB157,2,32146.36 Gender transition medical intervention. (1) Definitions. In 3this section:SB157,2,54(a) “Biological sex” means the biological state of being female or male based on 5sex organs, chromosomes, and endogenous hormone profiles.SB157,2,66(b) “Health care provider” has the meaning given in s. 146.81 (1) (a) to (hp).SB157,2,77(c) “Minor” means an individual who is under 18 years of age.SB157,2,118(2) Prohibition. A health care provider may not engage in, cause the 9engagement in, or make a referral for, any of the following practices upon a minor 10for the purpose of changing the minor’s body to correspond to a sex that is 11discordant with the minor’s biological sex:SB157,2,1412(a) Performing a surgery that sterilizes an individual, including castration, 13vasectomy, hysterectomy, oophorectomy, metoidioplasty, orchiectomy, penectomy, 14phalloplasty, and vaginoplasty.SB157,2,1515(b) Performing a mastectomy.SB157,2,1616(c) Administering, prescribing, or supplying any of the following medications:SB157,3,111. Puberty-blocking drugs to stop or delay normal puberty.SB157,3,322. Supraphysiologic doses of testosterone or other androgens to biological 3females.SB157,3,443. Supraphysiologic doses of estrogen to biological males.SB157,3,55(d) Removing any otherwise healthy or nondiseased body part or tissue.SB157,3,76(3) Applicability limitation. This section does not apply to any of the 7following:SB157,3,108(a) A health care provider providing a service in accordance with a good faith 9medical decision of a parent or guardian of a minor born with a medically verifiable 10genetic disorder of sex development, including any of the following:SB157,3,13111. External biological sex characteristics that are irresolvably ambiguous, 12such as in those born with 46,XX karyotype with virilization, with 46,XY karyotype 13with undervirilization, or having both ovarian and testicular tissue.SB157,3,17142. A sexual development disorder when a physician has determined through 15genetic testing that the minor does not have the normal sex chromosome structure, 16sex steroid hormone production, or sex steroid hormone action for a biological male 17or biological female.SB157,3,2118(b) The treatment of any infection, injury, disease, or disorder that has been 19caused by or exacerbated by the performance of a gender transition medical 20procedure, whether or not that procedure was performed in accordance with state 21and federal law.SB157,4,222(c) Any procedure undertaken because the minor suffers from a physical 23disorder, physical injury, or physical illness that would, as certified by a physician, 1place the minor in imminent danger of death or impairment of a major bodily 2function unless surgery is performed.SB157,23Section 2. 441.07 (1j) of the statutes is created to read:SB157,4,104441.07 (1j) Subject to the rules promulgated under s. 440.03 (1), the board 5shall investigate allegations that any person licensed under this chapter has 6violated s. 146.36 (2). After an investigation, if the board finds that there is 7probable cause to believe that the person violated s. 146.36 (2), the board shall hold 8a hearing on such conduct. After a hearing, if the board determines that the person 9has violated s. 146.36 (2), the board shall revoke the person’s license and, if 10applicable, the person’s certificate to issue prescription orders under s. 441.16.SB157,311Section 3. 441.07 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB157,4,1412441.07 (2) The board may reinstate a revoked license, no earlier than one year 13following revocation, upon receipt of an application for reinstatement. This 14subsection does not apply to a license that is revoked under sub. (1j) or s. 440.12.SB157,415Section 4. 448.02 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:SB157,5,216448.02 (3m) Investigations; hearing; action for gender transition 17medical intervention. The board shall investigate allegations that any person 18holding a license or certificate granted by the board has violated s. 146.36 (2). After 19an investigation, if the board finds that there is probable cause to believe that the 20person violated s. 146.36 (2), the board shall hold a hearing on such conduct. After 21a hearing, if the board determines that the person has violated s. 146.36 (2), the 22board shall revoke the person’s license or certificate. The board shall comply with 1the rules of procedure for the investigation, hearing, and action that are 2promulgated under ss. 440.03 (1) and 448.40.SB157,53Section 5. 448.02 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:SB157,5,84448.02 (6) Restoration of license or certificate. The board may restore 5any license or certificate that has been voluntarily surrendered or revoked under 6any of the provisions of this subchapter, on such terms and conditions as it may 7deem appropriate, except that the board may not restore any license or certificate 8that was revoked pursuant to sub. (3m).SB157,69Section 6. 448.02 (9) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB157,5,1510448.02 (9) Judicial review. (intro.) No injunction, temporary injunction, 11stay, restraining order or other order may be issued by a court in any proceeding for 12review that suspends or stays an order of the board to discipline a physician under 13sub. (3) (c), to revoke a physician’s license under sub. (3m), or to suspend or limit a 14physician’s license under sub. (4), except upon application to the court and a 15determination by the court that all of the following conditions are met:SB157,716Section 7. 448.978 (1v) of the statutes is created to read:SB157,5,2217448.978 (1v) Subject to the rules promulgated under s. 440.03 (1), the board 18shall investigate allegations that any person licensed under this subchapter has 19violated s. 146.36 (2). After an investigation, if the board finds that there is 20probable cause to believe that the person violated s. 146.36 (2), the board shall hold 21a hearing on such conduct. After a hearing, if the board determines that the person 22has violated s. 146.36 (2), the board shall revoke the person’s license.SB157,823Section 8. 448.978 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB157,6,51448.978 (2) (intro.) Subject to the rules promulgated under s. 440.03 (1) and 2except as provided in sub. (1v), if a person who applies for or holds a license or 3compact privilege issued under s. 448.974 does any of the following, the board may 4reprimand the person or deny, limit, suspend, or revoke the person’s license or 5compact privilege:SB157,96Section 9. Nonstatutory provisions.SB157,6,147(1) Legislative intent statement. By including a 6-month delayed effective 8date in Section 10 (1) of this act, the legislature intends to allow time for 9appropriate medication tapering and discontinuation under the care of a physician 10or other health care provider for any minor who is using puberty-blocking drugs or 11cross-sex hormones for the purpose of changing the minor’s body to correspond to a 12sex that is discordant with the minor’s biological sex and who will be a minor when 13the act takes effect. For purposes of this subsection, the terms “biological sex,” 14“health care provider,” and “minor” have the meanings given in s. 146.36 (1).SB157,1015Section 10. Effective date.SB157,6,1716(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after 17publication.SB157,6,1818